Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.010

Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the community and technical college act of 1991.

[ 1991 c 238 s 20; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.010. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.85.010.]